Washington statutes.
RCW 26.20.030

Family abandonment—Penalty—Exception.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who has a child dependent upon him or her for care, education or support and deserts such child in any manner whatever with intent to abandon it is guilty of the crime of family abandonment.

(2) A parent of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate location pursuant to RCW 13.34.360 is not subject to criminal liability under this section.

(3) The crime of family abandonment is a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2002 c 331 s 6; 1984 c 260 s 26; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 34; 1969 ex.s. c 207 s 2; 1955 c 249 s 1; 1953 c 255 s 1; 1943 c 158 s 1; 1913 c 28 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6908. Prior: 1907 c 103 s 1, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 331: See notes following RCW 13.34.360.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.

Leaving children unattended in parked automobile: RCW 9.91.060.